Hawaii statutes.
§462A-14 Lien for pilotage fees. Every
licensed pilot shall have a lien for the pilot's pilotage fees upon the whole
of any vessel liable to the pilot therefor. [L 1978, c 231, pt of §2; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next